Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2012
48-839
Changes made by Laws 2011, LB397;
applicability.

Changes
made to the Industrial Relations Act by Laws 2011, LB397 shall apply to petitions
filed with the commission on or after October 1, 2011, except for petitions
filed involving school districts, educational service units, and community
colleges with their certificated and instructional employees for which such
changes shall apply on or after July 1, 2012.

Laws 2011, LB397, § 16.